Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.280

Transfer of juvenile to department of corrections facility—Grounds—Hearing—Term—Retransfer to a facility for juveniles.

(1) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families, with the consent of the secretary of the department of corrections, has the authority to transfer a juvenile presently or hereafter committed to the department of children, youth, and families to the department of corrections for appropriate institutional placement in accordance with this section.

(2) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families may, with the consent of the secretary of the department of corrections, transfer a juvenile offender to the department of corrections if it is established at a hearing before a review board that continued placement of the juvenile offender in an institution for juvenile offenders presents a continuing and serious threat to the safety of others in the institution. The department of children, youth, and families shall establish rules for the conduct of the hearing, including provision of counsel for the juvenile offender.

(3) Assaults made against any staff member at a juvenile corrections institution that are reported to a local law enforcement agency shall require a hearing held by the department of children, youth, and families review board within ten judicial working days. The board shall determine whether the accused juvenile offender represents a continuing and serious threat to the safety of others in the institution.

(4) Upon conviction in a court of law for custodial assault as defined in RCW 9A.36.100, the department of children, youth, and families review board shall conduct a second hearing, within five judicial working days, to recommend to the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families that the convicted juvenile be transferred to an adult correctional facility if the review board has determined the juvenile offender represents a continuing and serious threat to the safety of others in the institution.

The juvenile has the burden to show cause why the transfer to an adult correctional facility should not occur.

(5) A juvenile offender transferred to an institution operated by the department of corrections shall not remain in such an institution beyond the maximum term of confinement imposed by the juvenile court.

(6) A juvenile offender who has been transferred to the department of corrections under this section may, in the discretion of the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families and with the consent of the secretary of the department of corrections, be transferred from an institution operated by the department of corrections to a facility for juvenile offenders deemed appropriate by the secretary.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 611. Prior: 1989 c 410 s 2; 1989 c 407 s 8; 1983 c 191 s 22.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Purpose—1989 c 410: "The legislature recognizes the ever-increasing severity of offenses committed by juvenile offenders residing in this state's juvenile detention facilities and the increasing aggressive nature of detained juveniles due to drugs and gang-related violence. The purpose of this act is to provide necessary protection to state employees and juvenile residents of these institutions from assaults committed against them by juvenile detainees." [ 1989 c 410 s 1.]